Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Automobile Graveyards

54-20-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Automobile graveyard” means any lot or place that is exposed to the weather and upon which more than five (5) motor vehicles of any kind, incapable of being operated, and that it would not be economically practical to make operative, are placed, located or found; and

“Automobile graveyard” or “automobile junkyard” is not to be construed to mean an establishment having facilities for processing iron, steel or nonferrous scrap and whose principal produce is scrap iron, steel or nonferrous scrap for sale for remelting purposes only.

Acts 1965, ch. 352, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 54-577, 54-5-901.

Cross-References. Automobile graveyards or junkyards, licensing and control, § 7-51-701.

Dealers in secondhand automobile tires and accessories, title 55, ch. 14.

Attorney General Opinions. Private act that imposes less stringent setback requirements for junkyards located along state highways than are required by general law is compatible with public statutes governing junkyards along state highways, OAG 05-032 (3/29/05).

54-20-202. Limitation on establishment — Exception.

No automobile graveyard shall hereafter be established within five hundred feet (500') of any state highway in this state, nor shall any automobile graveyard hereafter be established within one thousand feet (1,000') of any state highway in this state designated as a United States route by the American Association of State Highway Officials as through routes where official signs designating the highway have been erected indicating the highway to be a United States numbered highway.

This added restriction on the establishment of automobile graveyards located in relation to the United States numbered routes shall not apply in any case in which the land on which the automobile graveyard is to be established has been specifically designated or zoned for automobile graveyards by the governing body of the county or city in which it is proposed to be established.

Acts 1965, ch. 352, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-577, 54-5-902.

Cited: State v. Smith, 618 S.W.2d 474, 1981 Tenn. LEXIS 457 (Tenn. 1981).

54-20-203. Fence or hedge required.

Any person who maintains an automobile graveyard, any part of which is within five hundred feet (500') of any state highway, shall erect and maintain a fence or hedge around the automobile graveyard.

The fence or hedge shall be at least six feet (6') high and sufficient to conceal the automobile graveyard from the view of a person standing at the same level as the graveyard; provided, that no fence or hedge shall be required where erection of the fence or hedge would not effectively conceal a substantial portion of the automobile graveyard from the view of a person on the highway.

Acts 1965, ch. 352, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 54-577, 54-5-903.

54-20-204. Responsibility for removal of graveyard.

If any automobile graveyard is located within the limitations fixed in § 54-20-202 to any state highway, the automobile graveyard is not operated as a business by anyone, is not used for any purpose whatsoever, and no one claims ownership of the automobile graveyard, then the owner or owners of the land on which the automobile graveyard is located shall be responsible for the removal of the automobile graveyard.

Acts 1965, ch. 352, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 54-577, 54-5-904.

54-20-205. Enforcement of provisions — Violation a misdemeanor.

Any citizen of this state may obtain a warrant for the arrest of anyone violating this part, but it is declared to be a specific duty for the members of the Tennessee highway patrol to enforce this part.

A person violating any provision of this part commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Each day's subsequent violation constitutes a separate offense.

In the case of automobile graveyards established prior to March 26, 1965, the owners or operators of the automobile graveyard shall have a reasonable and necessary period of time in which to comply with this part.

Acts 1965, ch. 352, §§ 5, 6; T.C.A., §§ 54-577, 54-5-905; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Persons whose compensation is contingent upon issuance or nonissuance of warrants prohibited from issuing search warrant, arrest warrant or mittimus, § 40-5-106.